Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1501, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1501. Any person who shall:
1. Knowingly make or cause to be made, either directly or
indirectly, or through any agency whatsoever, any false statement in
writing, with intent that it shall be relied upon, respecting the
financial condition, or means or ability to pay of such person, or
any other person, firm or corporation, in whom the person is
interested, or for whom the person is acting, for the purpose of
procuring in any form whatsoever, either the delivery of personal
property, the payment of cash, the making of a loan or credit, the
Req. No. 15294 Page 1

exte nsion of a credit, the discount of an account receivable, or the
making, acceptance, discount, sale or endorsement of a bill of
exchange or promissory note, for the benefit of either such person
or any other person, firm or corporation;
2. With knowledge that a false statement in writing has been
made, respecting the financial condition or means or ability to pay,
of such person, or any other person, firm or corporation in which
the person is interested, or for whom the person is acting,
procures, upon the faith thereof, for the benefit of either such
person, or any other person, firm or corporation, either or any of
the things of benefit mentioned in paragraph 1 of this section;
3. With knowledge that a statement in writing has been made,
respecting the financial condition or means or ability to pay of
such person, or any other person, firm or corporation, in which the
person is interested, or for whom the person is acting, represents
on a later date in writing, that the statement theretofore made, if
then again made on said day, would be then true, when in fact, the
statement if then made would be false, and procures upon the faith
thereof, for the benefit of either such person or any other person,
firm or corporation, either or any of the things of benefit
mentioned in paragraph 1 of this section; or
4. Knowingly with intent to defraud, make any false statement
or report or willfully falsify the value of any land, property or
security for the purpose of influencing in any way the action taken
Req. No. 15294 Page 2

or d ecision made on any application, advance, discount, purchase,
purchase agreement, repurchase agreement, commitment or loan, or any
change or extension of any of the same, by renewal, deferment of
action or otherwise, or the acceptance, release or substitution of
security;
shall be, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor felony
punishable by imprisonment in the county jail custody of the
Department of Corrections for a term not more than six (6) months to
exceed two (2) years, or by a fine of not exceeding Five Hundred
Dollars ($500.00) less than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($2,500.00), or by both such fine and imprisonment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15294 GRS 01/11/26










Req. No. 15294 Page 3